en: Salmon rillettes
de: Lachs-Rillettes
fr: Rillettes de saumon
he: רייט סלמון
hr: Rillettes od lososa
nl: Zalmrillettes

en: Pink salmon rillettes
fr: Rillettes de saumon rose

en: Trout rillettes
fr: Rillettes de truite

en: Smoked trout rillettes
fr: Rillettes de truite fumée

en: French Rillettes, Rillettes from France
fr: Rillettes françaises, Rillettes de France, Rillettes de la France

en: Sarthe rillettes
fr: Rillettes de la Sarthe

en: Sausages
bg: Колбаси
ca: Embotits
da: Pølser
de: Würste, wurst
es: Salchichas
fi: makkarat
fr: Saucisses, saucisse
he: נקניקיות
hr: Kobasice
hu: Kolbász
it: Salsicce, wurstel
ja: ソーセージ
nl: Worsten
pl: Kiełbasy, Kiełbasa
pt: Salsichas
ru: Колбаса и сосиски
sv: Korvar, korv
th: ไส้กรอก
tr: Sosis
zh: 香肠

en: Beef sausages, Beef sausage
fr: Saucisses de bœuf, Saucisse de bœuf

en: Sausage meat
fr: Chair à saucisse
hr: Kobasica meso
it: Carne per salsicce

en: Pork sausages
bg: Свински колбаси
fr: Saucisses de porc, Saucisses au porc
hr: Svinjske kobasice
it: Salsicce di suino
ja: 豚のソーセージ
nl: Varkensworsten
pl: Kiełbasy wieprzowe, Kiełbasa wieprzowa

en: Sausage meat with pure pork
fr: Chair à saucisse pur porc

en: Ham sausages, Ham sausage
de: Schinkenwurst
fr: Saucisses de jambon pur porc, Saucisse de jambon pur porc
hr: Kobasice od šunke
pl: Kiełbasy z szynki, Kiełbasa z szynki

en: Sausage meat with pork and beef
fr: Chair à saucisse porc et bœuf

en: Beer sausages, Beer sausage
de: Bierwurst
fr: Saucisses de bière, Saucisse de bière

en: Poultry sausages
de: Geflügelwürste
es: Salchichas de aves
fi: siipikarjamakkarat
fr: Saucisses de volaille
he: נקניקיות עוף
hr: Kobasice od peradi
hu: Baromfi kolbász
it: Salsicce di pollame
nl: Gevogelteworst, Gevogelteworsten
pl: Kiełbasy drobiowe, Kiełbasa drobiowa
ru: Колбаса из мяса птицы

en: Poultry sausage delicatessen style
fr: Saucisse de volaille façon charcutière

fr: Saucisses cocktail
en: Cocktail sausage
es: Salchichas cocktail
hr: Koktel kobasica
nl: Cocktailworstjes

en: Bockwurst
de: Bockwurst
es: salchichas bockwurst
hr: Bockwurst

en: Sausages from Spain, Spanish sausages
es: Embutidos de España
fi: Espanjalaiset makkarat, Makkarat Espanjasta
fr: Saucisses espagnoles, Saucisses d'Espagne
hr: Kobasice iz Španjolske
hu: Spanyol kolbász
nl: Spaanse worsten

en: Tongue sausage with pistachios
fr: Saucisse de langue à la pistache